Arkansas statutes. Title 21 Public Officers and Employees
Chapter 9 Liability of State and Local Governments
Cited: Williams v. Jefferson Hospital Ass'n, 246 Ark. 1231, 442 S.W.2d 243 (1969); Reeme v. Natural Gas Imp. Dist., 247 Ark. 983, 448 S.W.2d 647 (1970); Wawak v. Stewart, 247 Ark. 1093, 449 S.W.2d 922 (1970); Lassiter v. State Farm Mut. Auto. Ins. Co., 371 F. Supp. 1221 (E.D. Ark. 1974); Collier v. City of Springdale, 733 F.2d 1311 (8th Cir. 1984); Delta Special Sch. Dist. No. 5 v. State Bd. of Educ., 745 F.2d 532 (8th Cir. 1984); Helms v. Southern Farm Bureau Cas. Ins. Co., 281 Ark. 450, 664 S.W.2d 870 (1984); Harrison v. Springdale Water & Sewer Comm'n, 780 F.2d 1422 (8th Cir. 1986); Little Rock Port Auth. v. McCain, 296 Ark. 130, 752 S.W.2d 44 (1988); Conway Corp. v. Construction Engineers, Inc., 300 Ark. 225, 782 S.W.2d 36 (1989); Dumond v. Conlee, 710 F. Supp. 1270 (E.D. Ark. 1988); Buttolph Trust v. Jarnagan, 302 Ark. 393, 789 S.W.2d 466 (1990); Almand v. Benton County, 145 B.R. 608 (Bankr. W.D. Ark. 1992); Waire v. Joseph, 308 Ark. 528, 825 S.W.2d 594 (1992); 65th Ctr., Inc. v. Copeland, 308 Ark. 456, 825 S.W.2d 574 (1992); Vinson Elec. Supply v. Poteete, 321 Ark. 516, 905 S.W.2d 831 (1995); Brown v. Fountain Hill Sch. Dist., 67 Ark. App. 358, 1 S.W.3d 27 (1999); Rudd v. Pulaski County Special Sch. Dist., 341 Ark. 794, 20 S.W.3d 310 (2000); Southern Farm Bureau Cas. Ins. Co. v. Spears, 360 Ark. 200, 200 S.W.3d 436 (2004); Passmore v. Hinchey, 2010 Ark. App. 581, 379 S.W.3d 497 (2010); Ark. Dep't of Human Servs. v. Fort Smith Sch. Dist., 2015 Ark. 81, 455 S.W.3d 294 (2015).

History.

Acts 1977, No. 543, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3404.